bg-BG: Съвместима течност за чистачки: За системи за измиване на камери; За отопляеми системи за измиване; За автомобили с устройства за измиване на фаровете; Безопасна за хидрофобни / водоотблъскващи покрития; Безопасна за затъмняващо фолио; Универсална; Друга
en: Compatible vehicle windshield fluid: For camera washer systems; For heated washer systems; For vehicles with headlight washers; Safe for hydrophobic / rain-repellent coatings; Safe for tinted film; Universal; Other
nl: Compatibele ruitensproeiervloeistof voor voertuigen: Voor camerawasinstallaties; Voor verwarmde ruitensproeiersystemen; Voor voertuigen met koplampsproeiers; Veilig voor waterafstotende coatings; Veilig voor getinte folie; Universeel; Overige
fi: Yhteensopiva ajoneuvon tuulilasinpesuneste: Kameranpesujärjestelmille; Lämmitetyille pesujärjestelmille; Ajoneuvoille, joissa on ajovalojen pesurit; Turvallinen hydrofobisille / sadetta hylkiville pinnoitteille; Turvallinen tummennuskalvoille; Universaali; Muu
hu: Kompatibilis szélvédőmosó folyadék: Kameramosó rendszerekhez; Fűtött mosórendszerekhez; Fényszórómosóval felszerelt járművekhez; Vízlepergető bevonatokon is biztonságos; Színezett fólián is biztonságos; Univerzális; Egyéb
ja: 互換性のある車両のフロントガラス洗浄液: カメラウォッシャーシステム用; 加熱式ウォッシャーシステム用; ヘッドライトウォッシャー搭載車用; 撥水コーティング車に安全; カーフィルムに安全; ユニバーサル; その他
tr: Uyumlu araç ön cam sıvısı: Kamera yıkama sistemleri için; Isıtmalı yıkama sistemleri için; Far yıkayıcıları olan araçlar için; Hidrofobik / yağmur kaydırıcı kaplamalar için güvenli; Cam filmleri için güvenli; Evrensel; Diğer
vi: Dung dịch rửa kính chắn gió xe tương thích: Cho hệ thống rửa camera; Cho hệ thống rửa kính sưởi nhiệt; Cho xe có hệ thống rửa đèn pha; An toàn cho lớp phủ kỵ nước/chống bám nước mưa; An toàn cho phim cách nhiệt; Đa năng; Khác
hr-HR: Kompatibilna tekućina za vjetrobransko staklo vozila: Za sustave pranja kamera; Za grijane sustave pranja; Za vozila s peračima prednjih svjetala; Sigurno za hidrofobne premaze / premaze protiv kiše; Sigurno za zatamnjene folije; Univerzalno; Ostalo
ko: 호환 차량 워셔액: 카메라 와셔 시스템용; 열선 와셔 시스템용; 헤드라이트 와셔 장착 차량용; 발수/방수 코팅에 안전함; 틴팅 필름에 안전함; 범용; 기타
pl: Kompatybilny płyn do spryskiwaczy pojazdu: Do systemów spryskiwaczy kamer; Do podgrzewanych spryskiwaczy; Dla pojazdów ze spryskiwaczami reflektorów; Bezpieczny dla powłok hydrofobowych / niewidzialnych wycieraczek; Bezpieczny dla folii przyciemniających; Uniwersalny; Inne
sl-SI: Združljiva tekočina za vetrobransko steklo vozila: Za sisteme za čiščenje kamer; Za ogrevane sisteme za čiščenje; Za vozila s sistemi za čiščenje žarometov; Varno za hidrofobne / vodoodbojne premaze; Varno za zatemnitvene folije; Univerzalno; Drugo
ru: Совместимая жидкость стеклоомывателя транспортного средства: Для систем омывателя камер; Для систем омывателя с подогревом; Для автомобилей с омывателями фар; Безопасно для гидрофобных / водоотталкивающих покрытий; Безопасно для тонировочной пленки; Универсальный; Другое
sk-SK: Kompatibilná kvapalina na čelné sklo vozidla: Pre systémy ostrekovačov kamier; Pre vyhrievané systémy ostrekovačov; Pre vozidlá s ostrekovačmi svetlometov; Bezpečné pre hydrofóbne povrchy / povrchy odpudzujúce dážď; Bezpečné pre tónovacie fólie; Univerzálna; Iné
de: Kompatible Fahrzeug-Scheibenwaschflüssigkeit: Für Kamera-Waschanlagen; Für beheizte Waschanlagen; Für Fahrzeuge mit Scheinwerferwaschanlage; Sicher für hydrophobe/regenabweisende Beschichtungen; Sicher für getönte Folien; Universal; Sonstige
lt-LT: Suderinamas transporto priemonės langų plovimo skystis: Kamerų plovimo sistemoms; Šildomoms plovimo sistemoms; Transporto priemonėms su žibintų plovikliais; Saugu hidrofobinėms / lietų atstumiančioms dangoms; Saugu tamsintoms plėvelėms; Universalu; Kita
ro-RO: Lichid de parbriz compatibil pentru vehicul: Pentru sistemele de spălare a camerelor video; Pentru sistemele de spălare încălzite; Pentru vehicule cu spălătoare de faruri; Sigur pentru straturi hidrofobe/care resping ploaia; Sigur pentru folii fumurii; Universal; Altele
pt-BR: Fluido para limpeza de para-brisa compatível com o veículo: Para sistemas de lavagem de câmera; Para sistemas de lavagem aquecidos; Para veículos com lavadores de farol; Seguro para revestimentos hidrofóbicos/repelentes de chuva; Seguro para películas escuras; Universal; Outro
th: น้ำยาเช็ดกระจกรถยนต์ที่ใช้งานด้วยได้: สำหรับระบบฉีดล้างกล้อง; สำหรับระบบฉีดล้างแบบทำความร้อน; สำหรับรถยนต์ที่มีที่ฉีดล้างไฟหน้า; ปลอดภัยต่อสารเคลือบกันน้ำ / กันฝน; ปลอดภัยต่อฟิล์มกรองแสง; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
da: Kompatibel sprinklervæske til køretøjer: Til kameravaskesystemer; Til opvarmede vaskesystemer; Til køretøjer med forlygtevaskere; Sikker til hydrofobiske / vandafvisende belægninger; Sikker til tonet film; Universal; Andet
nb: Kompatibel frontrutevæske: For kameravaskesystemer; For oppvarmede vaskesystemer; For kjøretøy med lyktespylere; Trygg for hydrofobe / vannavstøtende belegg; Trygg for tonet film; Universell; Annet
pt-PT: Fluido do pára-brisas compatível com o veículo: Para sistemas de lavagem de câmara; Para sistemas de lavagem aquecidos; Para veículos com lava-faróis; Seguro para revestimentos hidrofóbicos/repelentes de chuva; Seguro para película colorida; Universal; Outro
zh-TW: 相容的車用擋風玻璃清洗液: 用於攝影機清洗器系統; 用於加熱型清洗器系統; 用於配備頭燈清洗器的車輛; 對疏水性/防雨塗層安全; 對隔熱紙安全; 通用; 其他
sv: Kompatibel vindrutevätska för fordon: För kamerarengöringssystem; För uppvärmda spolarvätskesystem; För fordon med strålkastarspolare; Säker för hydrofoba/vattenavvisande beläggningar; Säker för tonad film; Universell; Övrigt
es: Líquido limpiaparabrisas compatible con el vehículo: Para sistemas lavadores de cámara; Para sistemas lavadores térmicos; Para vehículos con limpiadores de faros; Seguro para revestimientos hidrofóbicos / repelentes a la lluvia; Seguro para película tintada; Universal; Otro
fr: Type de liquide de lave-glace compatible: Pour systèmes de lavage de caméra; Pour systèmes de lavage chauffants; Pour véhicules équipés de lave-phares; Sans danger pour les revêtements hydrophobes / anti-pluie; Sans danger pour les vitres teintées; Universel; Autre
zh-CN: 适配汽车挡风玻璃清洗液: 适用于摄像头清洗系统; 适用于加热清洗系统; 适用于带大灯清洗器的车辆; 疏水/防雨涂层安全; 贴膜安全; 通用; 其他
cs: Kompatibilní kapalina pro čelní sklo vozidla: Pro systémy ostřikovačů kamer; Pro vyhřívané systémy ostřikovačů; Pro vozidla s ostřikovači světlometů; Bezpečné pro hydrofobní vrstvy / vrstvy odpuzující déšť; Bezpečné pro tónované fólie; Univerzální; Jiné
it: Liquido lavavetri compatibile: Per sistemi lavavetri per telecamere; Per sistemi lavavetri riscaldati; Per veicoli con lavafari; Sicuro per rivestimenti idrorepellenti/antipioggia; Sicuro per pellicole oscuranti; Universale; Altro
el: Συμβατό υγρό παρμπρίζ οχήματος: Για συστήματα πλύσης κάμερας; Για θερμαινόμενα συστήματα πλύσης; Για οχήματα με πλυστικά προβολέων; Ασφαλές για υδρόφοβες / υδατοαπωθητικές επιστρώσεις; Ασφαλές για φιμέ μεμβράνες; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο